Utah statutes.
78B-6-1237.   Investment of sale proceeds for nonresidents or unknown parties.

When there are proceeds of a sale belonging to an unknown owner or to a person outside the state who has no legal representative inside the state, the proceeds shall be invested in bonds of the United States, this state, or a political subdivision of the state for the benefit of the persons entitled the proceeds.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

